Tennessee, session 114, SB1347.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF TENNESSEE:
SECTION 1. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 57-9-101(c), is amended by deleting
the language "at least two (2) credible witnesses" and substituting "at least one (1) credible
witness".
SECTION 2. This act takes effect upon becoming a law, the public welfare requiring it.
SB1347
003177
- 1 -